Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-251
Libraries and museums; establishment;
maintenance; powers and duties
of mayor and city council.

The mayor and council
of any city of the first class may establish
and maintain public libraries, reading rooms, art galleries, and museums and provide the necessary grounds
or buildings therefor; purchase
the papers, books, maps, manuscripts, and
works of art and
objects of natural or scientific curiosity and instruction therefor; and receive donations and bequests
of money or property for the public libraries, reading rooms, art galleries,
and museums in trust or otherwise. The
mayor and city council may also pass necessary bylaws and regulations
for the protection and government of the public libraries, reading rooms, art galleries,
and museums. The ownership of the real and personal property of a public library shall be in the city. The mayor and city council shall approve
any personnel administrative or compensation policy or procedure applying
to a director or employee of a public library, reading room, art gallery,
or museum before such policy or procedure is implemented.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 49, p. 268;

Laws 1903, c. 19, § 10, p. 241;

R.S.1913, § 4867;

C.S.1922, § 4035;

C.S.1929, § 16-252;

R.S.1943, § 16-251;

Laws 2012, LB470, § 1.